West Virginia, session 2026, HB4095.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 1A. Search and Seizure. §62-1A-5. Breaking and entering premises. (a) The officer may break into a house, building or structure, or any part thereof, or anything therein, or any vehicle, vessel or other conveyance, to execute a search warrant, or commit such breaking as may be necessary to liberate himself or herself or a person aiding him or her in the execution of the warrant. If the place to be searched is a dwelling he or she shall not attempt a forcible entry until he or she shall have given notice of his or her authority and purpose and shall have been refused admittance.(b) While breaking and entering a premises, or serving a no-knock warrant, no law- enforcement officer, acting alone or in conspiracy with another, shall deprive any person or class of persons of the equal protection of the laws of this state, or of the equal privileges and immunities under the laws of this state, including, without limitation, the protections, privileges, and immunities guaranteed under the Constitution of the state. This deprivation may include, but is not limited to:(1) Any actions that are plainly incompetent; or(2) Any action that involves knowingly violating the law; or(3) Any clearly excessive force used by a law-enforcement officer that results in injury, death, or psychological trauma to the people within the area being searched; and(4) Engaging in behavior that is clearly reckless or negligent that leads to the injury, death, or psychological trauma of the person or persons subjected to the breaking and entering or no-knock warrant.(c) If a suit is brought, or investigation commenced, as a result of a deprivation described in subsection (b) of this section, the Court shall engage in a review of the law-enforcement officer's actions. If the Court finds that the law-enforcement officer committed a deprivation as described in subsection (b), the Court may find that the law-enforcement officer is not eligible for qualified immunity and must proceed as an individual concerning any financial or criminal findings made by the Court.(d) In addition to a review of the officer's actions, the Court shall also review the training, mentoring, and standard operating procedures used by a law enforcement agency, department, or office to prepare officers for situations similar to those described in this section. If the Court finds that the agency, department, or office did not adequately prepare an officer for situations similar to those described in this section or was negligent in providing said training, the agency, department, or office shall also be liable for the conduct of the officer and be made a party to any suit brought by those aggrieved by the officer in question.